District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Special Education for Young Adults in the Custody of the Department of
Corrections Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 2(b) of An Act To create a Department of Corrections in the District of
Columbia, approved June 27, 1946 (60 Stat. 320; D.C. Official Code § 24-211.02(b)), is
amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) The first paragraph (10) is amended by striking the period and inserting a semicolon
in its place.
(c) The second paragraph (10) is redesignated as paragraph (11).
(d) Paragraph (11) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in
its place.
(e) A new paragraph (12) is added to read as follows:
“(12) During school years 2025-2026 and 2026-2027, provide a free appropriate
public education (“FAPE”) under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, approved
April 13, 1970 (84 Stat. 175; 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.) (“IDEA”), and District law to individuals
with disabilities who are in its custody and detained in its secure facilities from the age of 18
through the end of the individual’s eligibility for FAPE under the IDEA and District law.”.
Sec. 3. Amendatory section 2 within section 10(a) of the Corrections Oversight
Improvement Omnibus Amendment Act of 2022, effective April 21, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-344; 70
DCR 635), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (12) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(b) Paragraph (13) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in
its place.
(c) A new paragraph (14) is added to read as follows:
“(14) During school years 2025-2026 and 2026-2027, provide a free appropriate
public education (“FAPE”) under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, approved
April 13, 1970 (84 Stat. 175; 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.) (“IDEA”), and District law to individuals
with disabilities who are in its custody and detained in its secure facilities from the age of 18
through the end of the individual’s eligibility for FAPE under the IDEA and District law.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect no longer than 90
days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section 412(a) of
the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official
Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2